Massachusetts, session 194th, H4184.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Scituate may grant four additional licenses for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138. The
licenses shall be subject to all of chapter 138, except section 17.
(b) The four licenses granted under this section shall only be exercised in the dining room
of a common victualler and such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and
appropriate by the licensing authority of the town of Scituate as certified in writing.
(c) The licensing authority for the town of Scituate may grant these licenses if the
applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the applicant is in good standing
with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.
of 2

(d) A license granted pursuant to this act shall not be sold or transferred by the licensee.
If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act, or any such license is
cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, the license shall be returned physically, with all of the
legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority of the town of
Scituate, which may then grant the license to a new applicant under the same conditions as
specified in this section.
(e) All licenses granted under this section shall be issued within 3 years after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsection (d) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2